Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 462.
SECTION 2. (1) If a person makes a report to the  Oregon Racing Commission of a vio-
lation or potential violation of a statute, rule or order relating to racing, the identity  of the
person making the report is confidential  and is not subject to disclosure as a public record
under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) A person making a report described in subsection (1) of this section may waive  the
confidentiality otherwise granted under this section.
Passed by Senate March 31, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 857 (SB 857-INTRO) Page 1